Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1909
Tuition and mandatory fees, defined.

Tuition and mandatory fees means the lesser of the student costs for tuition
and mandatory fees for a full-time, resident, undergraduate student for the
last completed award year at the eligible postsecondary educational institution
or the student costs for tuition and mandatory fees for a full-time, resident,
undergraduate student for the last completed award year at the University
of Nebraska-Lincoln.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 9.